Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB581.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1.1 and 2 of the act of December 19, 1975 (P.L.604, No.173), entitled "An act to facilitate the use of electronic funds transfer systems by providing that credits to accounts in financial institutions designated by recipients shall satisfy legal requirements for payments by cash or checks," are amended to read:Section 1.1. Electronic funds transfers.(a) Authorization.--For the purposes of any statute, rule or regulation requiring any payment to be made in lawful money or by check, whether for wages, salaries, commissions or other claims of any kind, the payment may be made by credit to an 1234567891011121314151617181920 account in a financial institution, including a payroll card account, authorized to accept deposits or payments if the recipient has authorized the method of payment in writing or electronically.(b) Duties of employers.--(1) An employer may pay wages, salaries or commissions due to an employee by credit to an account in a financial institution, including a payroll card account, in accordance with this subsection.(2) If the employer elects to eliminate both options for an employee to receive payment in lawful money or by check and offers payment only by credit to an account in a financial institution, t he employer shall notify the employee in clear and conspicuous language that the employee will no longer have the option to receive payment in lawful money or by check.(3) The employee shall receive the notice at least 45 days prior to the date of the payday that the employee will no longer have the option to receive payment in lawful money or by check. The notice shall:(i) clearly state that it is the employee's right to designate the account in a financial institution to receive payment;(ii) explain the employee's options, including direct deposit and a payroll card account;(iii) include the date of the payday that the employee will no longer have the option to receive payment in lawful money or by check;(iv) clearly state that, if the employee does not designate a financial institution at least seven days 20250SB0581PN0588 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to the payday specified under subparagraph (iii), the employer may make payment to the employee to a payroll card account established at a financial institution designated by the employer; and(v) include any form and instructions necessary for the employee to designate the account in a financial institution of the employee's choosing to receive payment.(c) Failure to designate financial institution.--(1) If an employee does not designate a financial institution at least seven days prior to the payday specified under subsection (b)(3)(iv), the employer may pay wages, salaries or commissions due to the employee to a payroll card account established at a financial institution designated by the employer that complies with the requirements of section 2.1 or temporarily by negotiable check, in the discretion of the employer.(2) Before initially enrolling an employee in a payroll card account in accordance with section 2.1(1), the employer shall offer the employee the opportunity to designate the account in a financial institution to receive payment in accordance with subsection (b).Section 2. Consumer protections.When wages, salaries, commissions or other payments are transferred to an account at a financial institution as described in section 1.1:(1) the financial institution holding the account to which transfers are made shall provide the employee or other payee with the disclosures, notices of transfer, change in term notices, access to account information and other 20250SB0581PN0588 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consumer protections to the extent required by 12 CFR [Part] Pt. 1005 (relating to electronic fund transfers (Regulation E)) and 83 Fed. Reg. 30, 6364 (February 13, 2018) (relating to rules concerning prepaid accounts under the Electronic Fund Transfer Act (Regulation E)); and(2) an employer shall provide an employee with a written or electronic statement of earnings and deductions each pay period in accordance with applicable law.Section 2. Section 2.1(4) and (9) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2.1. Payroll card accounts.In addition to any other requirements under this act, all of the following provisions apply when payment of wages, salaries, commissions or other compensation is made through transfers to a payroll card account:* * *(4) Prior to [obtaining an employee's authorization, the] enrolling an employee in a payroll card account, the employer shall provide the employee with clear and conspicuous notice relating to payroll cards issued under paragraph (1), in writing or electronically, of all of the following:(i) All of the employee's wage payment options. The disclosure under this subparagraph shall include a statement substantially similar to any of the following:(A) "You do not have to accept this payroll card. Ask your employer about other ways to receive your wages."(B) "You have several options to receive your wages: (list of options available to the employee, 20250SB0581PN0588 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including direct deposit into a checking account of the employee's choosing) or this payroll card. Tell your employer which option you choose."(ii) The terms and conditions of the payroll card account option, including the fees that may be deducted from the employee's payroll card account by the card issuer.(iii) A notice that third parties may assess fees in addition to the fees assessed by the card issuer.(iv) The methods available to the employee for accessing wages without fees.* * *(9) The employer shall honor an employee's written or electronic request to change the employee's method of receiving wages from a payroll card account to direct deposit [or negotiable check]. The change shall take effect as soon as practicable, but no later than the first payday after 14 days from receipt by the employer of the employee's request and any information necessary to implement the change.* * *(11) In addition to the restrictions on payroll card accounts specified under this section, if an employer removes the option for an employee to receive payment by both lawful money and check and makes payment to employees by a payroll card account established at a financial institution designated by the employer in accordance with section 1.1(b) and (c):(i) the employer may not use a payroll card account that charges a fee for the overdraft of the payroll card account; and20250SB0581PN0588 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) in lieu of the limits on fees specified under paragraph (5)(ii), the payroll card account shall provide the employee with the ability, without charge by the card issuer, to make two in-network ATM withdrawals each pay period, or if the employee is paid more frequently than weekly, one in-network ATM withdrawal weekly.Section 3. The addition of section 2.1(11) of the act shall not apply to payroll card accounts provided to employees before the effective date of this section.Section 4. Nothing in this act shall affect, modify or amend a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0581PN0588 - 6 - 12345678910111213